Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
BATTERY ENERGY STORAGE SYSTEM
(Energy Facility Siting Council)
SECTION 1.  ORS 469.300 is amended to read:
469.300. As used in ORS 469.300 to 469.563,  469.590 to 469.619, 469.930 and 469.992, unless the
context requires otherwise:
(1) “Applicant” means any person who makes application for a site certificate  in the manner
provided in ORS 469.300 to 469.563, 469.590 to 469.619, 469.930 and 469.992.
(2) “Application” means a request for approval of a particular site or sites for the construction
and operation of an energy facility or  the construction and operation of an additional energy facility
upon a site for which a certificate has already been issued,  filed in accordance with the procedures
established pursuant to ORS 469.300 to 469.563, 469.590 to 469.619, 469.930 and 469.992.
(3) “Associated  transmission lines” means new transmission lines constructed to connect an
energy facility to  the first point of junction of such transmission line or lines with either a power
distribution system or an interconnected primary transmission system or both or to the Northwest
Power  Grid.
(4) “Average electric generating capacity” means the peak  generating capacity of the facility
divided by one of the following factors:
(a) For wind facilities, 3.00;
(b) For geothermal energy facilities, 1.11; or
(c) For all other energy facilities, 1.00.
(5) “Battery energy storage system” means an energy storage  system that, other than
for personal, noncommercial use:
(a) Collects energy from the electric grid or an energy generation facility;
(b) Uses rechargeable batteries to retain and store the energy for a period of time; and
(c) Discharges the energy after storage to provide electricity when needed.
[(5)] (6) “Combustion turbine power plant” means a thermal  power plant consisting of one or
more fuel-fired combustion turbines and any associated waste heat combined cycle generators.
Enrolled House Bill 4015 (HB 4015-INTRO) Page 1
[(6)] (7) “Construction” means work performed on  a site, excluding surveying, exploration or
other activities to define or characterize the site, the cost of which exceeds $250,000.
[(7)] (8) “Council” means the Energy Facility Siting Council established under ORS 469.450.
[(8)] (9) “Department” means the State Department of Energy created under ORS 469.030.
[(9)] (10) “Director” means the Director of the State Department of Energy appointed under ORS
469.040.
[(10)] (11) “Electric utility” means persons, regulated electrical  companies, people’s utility dis-
tricts, joint operating agencies, electric cooperatives, municipalities or any combination  thereof,
engaged in or authorized to engage  in the business of generating, supplying, transmitting or dis-
tributing electric energy.
[(11)(a)] (12)(a) “Energy facility” means any of the following:
(A) An electric power generating plant with a nominal electric  generating capacity of 25
megawatts or more, including but not limited to:
(i) Thermal power;
(ii) Combustion turbine power plant; or
(iii) Solar thermal power plant.
(B) A nuclear installation as defined in this section.
(C) A high  voltage transmission line of more than 10 miles in length with a capacity of 230,000
volts or more to be constructed in more than one city or county in this state, but excluding:
(i) Lines  proposed for construction entirely within 500 feet of an existing corridor occupied by
high voltage transmission lines with a capacity of 230,000 volts or more;
(ii) Lines of 57,000  volts or more that are rebuilt and upgraded to 230,000 volts along the same
right of way; and
(iii) Associated transmission lines.
(D) A solar photovoltaic power generation facility using more than:
(i) 240 acres located on high-value farmland as defined in ORS 195.300;
(ii) 2,560 acres located on land  that is predominantly cultivated or that, if not cultivated, is
predominantly composed of soils that are in  capability classes I to IV, as specified by the National
Cooperative Soil Survey operated  by the Natural Resources Conservation Service of the United
States Department of Agriculture; or
(iii) 3,840 acres located on any other land.
(E) A pipeline that is:
(i) At least six inches in diameter, and five or more miles in length,  used for the transportation
of crude petroleum or a derivative thereof, liquefied  natural gas, a geothermal energy form in a
liquid state or  other fossil energy resource, excluding a pipeline conveying natural or synthetic gas;
(ii) At least 16 inches in diameter, and five or more miles in  length, used for the transportation
of natural or synthetic gas, but excluding:
(I) A pipeline  proposed for construction of which less than five miles of the pipeline is more than
50 feet from a public road, as defined in ORS 368.001; or
(II) A parallel or upgraded pipeline up to 24 inches in diameter that  is constructed within the
same right of way as an existing 16-inch or larger pipeline  that has a site certificate, if all studies
and necessary mitigation conducted for the existing site certificate meet  or are updated to meet
current site certificate standards; or
(iii) At least 16 inches in diameter and five or more miles in length used to carry  a geothermal
energy form in a gaseous state but excluding a pipeline  used to distribute heat within a geothermal
heating district established under ORS chapter 523.
(F) A synthetic fuel plant which converts a natural  resource including, but not limited to, coal
or oil to a gas, liquid or solid product intended to be used as a fuel and  capable of being burned to
produce the equivalent of two billion Btu of heat a day.
(G) A plant which converts biomass to  a gas, liquid or solid product, or combination of such
products, intended to be used as a fuel and if any one of such products  is capable of being burned
to produce the equivalent of six billion Btu of heat a day.
Enrolled House Bill 4015 (HB 4015-INTRO) Page 2
(H) A storage facility for liquefied natural gas constructed after September 29, 1991, that is  de-
signed to hold at least 70,000 gallons.
(I) A surface facility related to an underground gas  storage reservoir that, at design injection
or withdrawal rates, will receive or deliver more  than 50 million cubic feet of natural or synthetic
gas per day, or require more than 4,000 horsepower of natural gas compression  to operate, but ex-
cluding:
(i) The underground storage reservoir;
(ii) The injection, withdrawal or monitoring wells and individual wellhead equipment; and
(iii) An underground gas storage reservoir into  which gas is injected solely for testing or res-
ervoir maintenance purposes or to facilitate the secondary recovery of oil or other hydrocarbons.
(J) An electric power generating plant with an  average electric generating capacity of 50
megawatts or more if the power is produced from geothermal or wind energy at a single energy  fa-
cility or within a single energy generation area.
(b) “Energy facility” does not include a hydroelectric facility or an energy facility  under para-
graph (a)(A)(iii) or (D) of this subsection that is established on the site of a  decommissioned United
States Air Force facility that has adequate transmission capacity to serve the energy facility.
[(12)] (13) “Energy generation area” means an area within which  the effects of two or more
small generating plants  may accumulate so the small generating plants have effects of a magnitude
similar to a  single generating plant of 35 megawatts average electric generating capacity or more.
An “energy  generation area” for facilities using a geothermal resource and covered by a unit
agreement, as provided in ORS 522.405 to 522.545 or by federal law, shall  be defined in that unit
agreement. If no such unit agreement  exists, an energy generation area for facilities using a
geothermal  resource  shall be the area that is within two miles, measured from the electrical gen-
erating equipment of the facility, of an existing or proposed geothermal  electric power generating
plant, not including the site of any other such plant not owned or controlled by the same person.
[(13)] (14) “Extraordinary nuclear occurrence”  means any event causing a discharge or dispersal
of source material, special nuclear material or by-product material as those terms are defined  in
ORS 453.605, from its intended place  of confinement off-site, or causing radiation levels off-site, that
the United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission  or its successor determines to be substantial and
to have resulted in or to be likely to result in substantial damages to persons or property off-site.
[(14)] (15) “Facility” means an energy facility together with  any related or supporting facilities.
[(15)] (16) “Geothermal  reservoir” means an aquifer or aquifers containing a common geothermal
fluid.
[(16)] (17) “Local government” means a city or county.
[(17)] (18) “Nominal electric generating capacity” means the  maximum net electric power output
of an energy  facility based on the average temperature, barometric pressure and relative humidity
at the site during the times of the year when the facility is intended to operate.
[(18)] (19) “Nuclear incident” means any occurrence,  including an extraordinary nuclear occur-
rence, that results in bodily injury, sickness, disease, death, loss of  or damage to property or loss
of use of property due to the  radioactive, toxic, explosive or other hazardous properties of source
material, special nuclear material  or by-product material as those terms are defined in ORS 453.605.
[(19)] (20) “Nuclear installation” means any power reactor,  nuclear fuel fabrication plant, nu-
clear fuel reprocessing plant, waste  disposal facility for radioactive waste, and any facility handling
that quantity of fissionable materials  sufficient to form a critical mass. “Nuclear installation” does
not include any such facilities that are part of a thermal power plant.
[(20)] (21) “Nuclear power plant” means  an electrical or any other facility using nuclear energy
with a nominal electric generating capacity of 25 megawatts or more, for generation and distribution
of electricity, and associated transmission lines.
[(21)] (22) “Person” means an individual, partnership, joint  venture, private or public corpo-
ration, association, firm, public service company, political  subdivision, municipal corporation, gov-
ernment agency, people’s utility district, or any other entity, public or private, however organized.
Enrolled House Bill 4015 (HB 4015-INTRO) Page 3
[(22)] (23) “Project order” means the order, including any  amendments, issued by the State De-
partment of Energy under ORS 469.330.
[(23)(a)] (24)(a) “Radioactive waste” includes all  material which is discarded, unwanted or has
no present lawful economic use, and contains mined or refined naturally occurring  isotopes, accel-
erator produced isotopes and by-product material, source  material or special nuclear material as
those terms are defined in ORS 453.605.
(b) “Radioactive waste” does not include:
(A) Materials identified by the council by rule as presenting no  significant danger to the public
health and safety.
(B) Uranium mine overburden or uranium mill tailings, mill wastes or mill by-product materials
as those terms are defined in Title 42, United States Code, section 2014, on June 25, 1979.
[(24)] (25) “Related or supporting facilities” means any  structure, proposed by the applicant, to
be constructed or substantially modified in connection with  the construction of an energy facility,
including associated transmission lines, reservoirs, storage facilities,  intake structures, road and rail
access, pipelines, barge basins, office or public buildings, and  commercial and industrial structures.
“Related or supporting facilities” does not  include geothermal or underground gas storage reser-
voirs, production, injection or monitoring wells or wellhead equipment or pumps.
[(25)] (26) “Site” means any proposed location of an energy facility  and related or supporting
facilities.
[(26)] (27) “Site certificate” means the binding agreement  between the State of Oregon and the
applicant, authorizing the applicant to construct and operate a facility  on an approved site, incor-
porating all conditions imposed by the council on the applicant.
[(27)] (28) “Thermal power plant” means an electrical facility using any source  of thermal en-
ergy with a nominal electric generating capacity of 25 megawatts or more, for generation and  dis-
tribution of electricity, and associated transmission lines, including but  not limited to a
nuclear-fueled,  geothermal-fueled  or fossil-fueled power plant, but not including a portable power
plant the principal use of which is to  supply power in emergencies. “Thermal power plant” includes
a nuclear-fueled thermal power plant that has ceased to operate.
[(28)] (29) “Transportation” means the transport  within the borders of the State of Oregon of
radioactive material destined for or derived from any location.
[(29)] (30) “Underground gas storage reservoir” means any  subsurface sand, strata, formation,
aquifer, cavern or void, whether natural or artificially created, suitable  for the injection, storage
and withdrawal of natural gas  or other gaseous substances. “Underground gas storage reservoir”
includes a pool as defined in ORS 520.005.
[(30)] (31) “Utility” includes:
(a) A person, a regulated electrical company, a people’s utility  district, a joint operating agency,
an electric cooperative, municipality  or any combination thereof, engaged in or authorized to engage
in the business of generating, transmitting or distributing electric energy;
(b) A person  or public agency generating electric energy from an energy facility for its own
consumption; and
(c) A person engaged in this state  in the transmission or distribution of natural or synthetic gas.
[(31)] (32) “Waste disposal facility” means  a geographical site in or upon which radioactive
waste is held or placed but does not include a site at which radioactive waste used or generated
pursuant to  a license granted under ORS 453.635 is stored temporarily, a site of a thermal power
plant used for the temporary  storage of radioactive waste from that plant for which a site certificate
has been issued pursuant to this chapter or a site used  for temporary storage of radioactive waste
from a reactor operated by a college, university or graduate center for  research purposes and not
connected to the Northwest Power Grid. As used  in this subsection, “temporary storage” includes
storage of radioactive waste on the site of a  nuclear-fueled thermal power plant for which a site
certificate has been issued until a permanent storage site is available by the federal government.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 469.320 is amended to read:
Enrolled House Bill 4015 (HB 4015-INTRO) Page 4
469.320. (1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (5) of  this section, no facility shall be
constructed or expanded unless a site certificate has been issued for the site thereof in  the manner
provided in ORS 469.300 to 469.563, 469.590 to 469.619, 469.930 and 469.992. No  facility shall be
constructed or operated except in  conformity with the requirements of ORS 469.300 to 469.563,
469.590 to 469.619, 469.930 and 469.992.
(2) A site certificate is not required for:
(a) An energy facility for which no site certificate has been issued that, on August 2,  1993, had
operable electric generating equipment for a modification that uses  the same fuel type and increases
electric generating capacity, if:
(A) The site is not enlarged; and
(B) The ability of the energy facility to use fuel for  electricity production under peak steady
state operating conditions is not more than 200 million Btu  per hour greater than it was on August
2, 1993, or the energy  facility expansion is called for in the short-term plan of action of an energy
resource plan that has been acknowledged by the Public Utility Commission of Oregon.
(b) Construction or expansion of any interstate natural gas pipeline or  associated underground
natural gas storage facility authorized by and subject to the continuing regulation  of the Federal
Energy Regulatory Commission or successor agency.
(c) An energy facility, except coal and nuclear power plants, if the energy facility:
(A) Sequentially produces electrical energy and useful thermal energy from the same fuel source;
and
(B) Under average annual operating conditions, has a nominal electric generating capacity:
(i) Of less than 50 megawatts and the fuel  chargeable to power heat rate value is not greater
than 6,000 Btu per kilowatt hour;
(ii) Of 50 megawatts  or more and the fuel chargeable to power heat rate value is not greater
than 5,500 Btu per kilowatt hour; or
(iii) Specified by the Energy Facility Siting Council by rule based  on the council’s determination
relating to emissions of the energy facility.
(d) Temporary storage,  at the site of a nuclear-fueled thermal power plant for which a site cer-
tificate has been issued by the State of Oregon, of radioactive waste from the plant.
(e) An energy facility as defined in ORS 469.300 [ (11)(a)(G)] (12)(a)(G), if the plant also produces
a secondary fuel used on site for the production of heat  or electricity, if the output of the primary
fuel is less than six billion Btu of heat a day.
(f) An energy facility as defined in ORS 469.300 [ (11)(a)(G)] (12)(a)(G), if the facility:
(A) Exclusively uses biomass, including but not limited to grain,  whey, potatoes, oilseeds, waste
vegetable oil or cellulosic biomass, as the source of material for conversion to a liquid fuel;
(B) Has received local land use approval  under the applicable acknowledged comprehensive plan
and land use regulations of the affected local government and the facility complies  with any state-
wide planning goals or rules of the  Land Conservation and Development Commission that are di-
rectly applicable to the facility;
(C) Requires no new  electric transmission lines or gas or petroleum product pipelines that would
require a site certificate under subsection (1) of this section;
(D) Produces synthetic fuel, at  least 90 percent of which is used in an industrial or refueling
facility located within one mile  of the facility or is transported from the facility by rail or barge;
and
(E) Emits less than 118 pounds of carbon dioxide per million Btu from fossil fuel used for  con-
version energy.
(g) A standby generation facility, if the facility complies with all of the following:
(A) The facility has received local land use approval under the applicable acknowledged  com-
prehensive plan and  land use regulations of the affected local government and the facility complies
with all statewide planning goals  and applicable rules of the Land Conservation and Development
Commission;
Enrolled House Bill 4015 (HB 4015-INTRO) Page 5
(B) The standby generators have been approved by the  Department of Environmental Quality
as having complied with  all applicable air and water quality requirements. For an applicant that
proposes to provide the physical facilities for the  installation of standby generators, the requirement
of this subparagraph may be met  by agreeing to require such a term in the lease contract for the
facility;  and
(C) The standby generators are electrically incapable of being interconnected to the  trans-
mission grid. For an applicant that proposes to provide the physical facilities for the installation  of
standby generators, the requirement of this subparagraph may be met by  agreeing to require such
a term in the lease contract for the facility.
(3) The Energy Facility  Siting Council may review and, if necessary, revise the fuel chargeable
to power heat rate value set forth  in subsection (2)(c)(B) of this section. In making its determination,
the council shall ensure that the fuel chargeable to power heat rate value for facilities set forth  in
subsection (2)(c)(B) of this section remains significantly lower  than the fuel chargeable to power
heat rate value for  the best available, commercially viable thermal power plant technology at the
time of the revision.
(4)(a)(A) Any person who proposes to construct or enlarge an  energy facility and who claims
an exemption under subsection (2)(a), (c) or (f) of this section from the requirement to obtain a  site
certificate shall request the Energy Facility Siting Council to determine whether the proposed fa-
cility qualifies for the claimed exemption.
(B) The council may not require a person who operates or  proposes to construct or enlarge an
energy facility to request that the council determine whether  the proposed facility qualifies for ex-
emption under subsection (2)(g) of this section.
(b) The council shall make its determination within 60 days after  the request for exemption is
filed. An appeal from the council’s determination on a request for exemption shall be  made under
ORS 469.403, except that the  scope of review by the Supreme Court shall be the same as a review
by a circuit court under ORS 183.484. The record  on review by the Supreme Court shall be the re-
cord established in the council proceeding on the exemption.
(5) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of  this section, a separate site certificate shall not be re-
quired for:
(a) Transmission lines, battery energy storage systems,  storage facilities,  pipelines or similar
related or supporting facilities, if such related or  supporting facilities are addressed in and are
subject to a site certificate for another energy facility;
(b) Expansion within the site or within the energy generation area  of a facility for which a site
certificate has been issued, if the existing site certificate has  been amended to authorize expansion;
or
(c) Expansion, either within the site or outside the site,  of an existing council certified surface
facility related to an underground gas  storage reservoir, if the existing site certificate is amended
to authorize expansion.
(6) If the substantial loss of the steam host  causes a facility exempt under subsection (2)(c) of
this section to substantially fail to meet the exemption  requirements under subsection (2)(c) of this
section, the electric generating facility shall cease to operate one year after the  substantial loss of
the steam host unless an application for  a site certificate has been filed in accordance with the
provisions of ORS 469.300 to 469.563.
(7) As used in this section:
(a) “Standby generation facility” means an electric power generating facility, including standby
generators and the physical structures necessary to  install and connect standby generators, that
provides temporary electric power in the event of a power outage and  that is electrically incapable
of being interconnected with the transmission grid.
(b) “Total energy output” means the sum of useful thermal energy output and useful electrical
energy output.
(c) “Useful thermal  energy” means the verifiable thermal energy used in any viable industrial
or commercial process, heating or cooling application.
Enrolled House Bill 4015 (HB 4015-INTRO) Page 6
(8)(a) If the developer of a  facility elects, or the governing body of the local government after
consulting with the developer elects, to defer regulatory authority to the Energy Facility  Siting
Council, the developer of  a facility shall obtain a site certificate, in the manner provided in ORS
469.300 to 469.563, 469.590 to 469.619, 469.930 and 469.992, for a  facility that, notwithstanding the
definition of “energy facility” in ORS 469.300, is:
(A) An electric power generating plant with  an average electric generating capacity of less than
50 megawatts produced from wind energy at a  single energy facility or within a single energy gen-
eration area;
(B) An associated transmission line; [ or]
(C) A battery energy storage system; or
[(C)] (D) A solar photovoltaic power generation facility  that is not an energy facility as defined
in ORS 469.300 [ (11)(a)(D)] (12)(a)(D).
(b) An election by a developer or a local government under this subsection is final.
(c) An election by a local government under this  subsection is not a land use decision as defined
in ORS 197.015.
(d) A local government may not  make an election under this subsection after a permit applica-
tion has been submitted under ORS 215.416 or 227.175.
CONFORMING AMENDMENTS
SECTION 3.
 ORS 469.503 is amended to read:
469.503. In order to issue a  site certificate, the Energy Facility Siting Council shall determine
that the preponderance of the evidence on the record supports the following conclusions:
(1) The facility complies with the applicable standards adopted by the council  pursuant to ORS
469.501 or the overall public benefits of the facility outweigh any adverse effects on a resource or
interest protected by the applicable standards the facility does not meet.
[(2)] (2)(a) If the energy facility is a fossil-fueled power plant, the energy facility  complies with
any applicable carbon dioxide emissions standard adopted  by the council or enacted by statute. Base
load gas plants shall comply with the standard set forth in [ subsection (2)(a) of this section ] para-
graph (b) of  this subsection . Other fossil-fueled power plants shall comply with any applicable
standard adopted by the council by rule pursuant to [ subsection (2)(b) of this section ] paragraph (c)
of this subsection . [ Subsections (2)(c) and (d) of this section ] Paragraphs (d) and  (e) of this sub-
section prescribe the means by which an applicant may comply with the applicable standard.
[(a)] (b) The  net carbon dioxide emissions rate of the proposed base load gas plant shall not
exceed 0.70 pounds of carbon dioxide  emissions per kilowatt hour of net electric power output, with
carbon dioxide emissions and net electric power output measured on a new and  clean basis.
Notwithstanding the foregoing, the council may  by rule modify the carbon dioxide emissions stand-
ard for base load gas plants if the  council finds that the most efficient stand-alone combined cycle,
combustion turbine, natural gas-fired energy facility  that is commercially demonstrated and operat-
ing in the United States has a  net heat rate of less than 7,200 Btu per kilowatt hour higher heating
value adjusted to ISO  conditions. In modifying the carbon dioxide emission standard, the council
shall determine the rate of carbon dioxide emissions per kilowatt hour of net electric  output of such
energy facility, adjusted to ISO conditions, and reset the carbon dioxide emissions standard  at 17
percent below this rate.
[(b)] (c) The council  shall adopt carbon dioxide emissions standards for other types of fossil-
fueled power plants. Such carbon dioxide emissions standards  shall be promulgated by rule. In
adopting or amending  such carbon dioxide emissions standards, the council shall consider and bal-
ance at  least the following principles, the findings on which shall be contained in the rulemaking
record:
(A) Promote facility fuel efficiency;
(B) Promote efficiency in the resource mix;
(C) Reduce net carbon dioxide emissions;
Enrolled House Bill 4015 (HB 4015-INTRO) Page 7
(D) Promote cogeneration that reduces net carbon dioxide emissions;
(E) Promote innovative technologies and  creative approaches to mitigating, reducing or avoiding
carbon dioxide emissions;
(F) Minimize transaction costs;
(G) Include an alternative process that separates decisions  on the form and implementation of
offsets from the final decision on granting a site certificate;
(H) Allow either the applicant or third parties to implement offsets;
(I) Be attainable and economically achievable for various types of power plants;
(J) Promote public participation in the selection and review of offsets;
(K) Promote prompt implementation of offset projects;
(L) Provide for monitoring and evaluation of the performance of offsets; and
(M) Promote reliability of the regional electric system.
[(c)] (d) The council shall determine whether the applicable  carbon dioxide emissions standard
is met by first determining the  gross carbon dioxide emissions that are reasonably likely to result
from the operation of the proposed energy facility. Such determination shall be based on  the pro-
posed design of  the energy facility. The council shall adopt site certificate conditions to ensure that
the predicted carbon dioxide emissions are not exceeded on a new and clean basis. For any re-
maining emissions reduction necessary to meet the applicable standard, the applicant may elect  to
use any of subparagraphs (A) to (D) of this paragraph, or any  combination thereof. The council shall
determine the amount of carbon dioxide or other greenhouse  gas emissions reduction that is rea-
sonably likely to result from  the applicant’s offsets and whether the resulting net carbon dioxide
emissions meet the applicable carbon dioxide emissions standard. For purposes of determining the
net carbon dioxide emissions, the council shall by rule establish  the global warming potential of
each greenhouse gas based on a generally accepted scientific method, and convert any greenhouse
gas emissions to a carbon dioxide equivalent. Unless otherwise provided by the  council by rule, the
global warming potential of methane is 23 times that  of carbon dioxide, and the global warming
potential of nitrous oxide is  296 times that of carbon dioxide. If the council or a court on judicial
review concludes that the applicant has not demonstrated compliance with the applicable carbon
dioxide emissions standard under subparagraphs  (A), (B) or (D) of this paragraph, or any combina-
tion thereof, and the  applicant has agreed to meet the requirements of subparagraph (C) of this
paragraph for  any deficiency, the council or a court shall find compliance based on such agreement.
For purposes of this paragraph, the applicable carbon dioxide emissions standards are:
(A) The facility will  sequentially produce electrical and thermal energy from the same fuel
source, and the thermal energy will be used to displace another source of carbon dioxide emissions
that would have otherwise continued to occur, in  which case the council shall adopt site certificate
conditions ensuring that the carbon dioxide emissions reduction will be achieved.
(B) The applicant or a third party will implement particular offsets,  in which case the council
may adopt site certificate conditions ensuring that the proposed offsets are implemented  but shall
not require that predicted levels of avoidance, displacement or sequestration of greenhouse  gas
emissions be achieved. The council shall determine the quantity of greenhouse  gas emissions re-
duction that is  reasonably likely to result from each of the proposed offsets based on the criteria
in sub-subparagraphs  (i) to (iii) of this subparagraph. In making this determination, the council shall
not allow credit for offsets that have already been allocated or awarded credit for greenhouse gas
emissions reduction in another regulatory setting. In addition, the fact that an applicant or  other
parties involved with an  offset may derive benefits from the offset other than the reduction of
greenhouse gas emissions is not, by itself, a basis for withholding credit for an offset. The criteria
required under this subparagraph shall be:
(i) The degree of certainty that the predicted quantity  of greenhouse gas emissions reduction
will be achieved by the offset;
(ii) The ability  of the council to determine the actual quantity of greenhouse gas emissions re-
duction resulting from the offset, taking into  consideration any proposed measurement, monitoring
and evaluation of mitigation measure performance; and
Enrolled House Bill 4015 (HB 4015-INTRO) Page 8
(iii) The extent to which the reduction of greenhouse gas emissions would occur  in the absence
of the offsets.
(C) The applicant or a  third party agrees to provide funds in an amount deemed sufficient to
produce the reduction in greenhouse gas emissions necessary to meet the  applicable carbon dioxide
emissions standard, in which case the funds shall be used as specified  in paragraph [ (d)] (e) of this
subsection. Unless modified by the council as provided  below, the payment of 57 cents shall be
deemed to result in a reduction of one ton of carbon  dioxide emissions. The council shall determine
the offset funds using the monetary offset rate and the level of emissions reduction required  to meet
the applicable standard. If a site certificate  is approved based on this subparagraph, the council may
not adjust the amount of such offset funds based on the  actual performance of offsets. After three
years from June 26, 1997, the council  may by rule increase or decrease the monetary offset rate of
57 cents per ton of  carbon dioxide emissions. Any change to the monetary offset rate shall be based
on empirical evidence of the cost of offsets  and the council’s finding that the standard will be eco-
nomically achievable with the modified rate for natural gas-fired  power plants. Following the initial
three-year period, the council may increase or decrease the monetary offset  rate no more than 50
percent in any two-year period.
(D) Any other means that the council adopts by rule for demonstrating  compliance with any
applicable carbon dioxide emissions standard.
[(d)] (e) If the applicant elects to meet the applicable carbon  dioxide emissions standard in
whole or in part under paragraph [ (c)(C)] (d)(C) of this subsection, the  applicant shall identify the
qualified organization. The applicant may identify  an organization that has applied for, but has not
received, an exemption from federal income taxation, but the council may  not find that the organ-
ization is a qualified organization unless the organization is exempt from federal taxation under
section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code as amended and in effect on December 31, 1996. The
site certificate holder shall provide a bond or comparable security  in a form reasonably acceptable
to the council to ensure the  payment of the offset funds and the amount required under subpara-
graph (A)(ii) of this paragraph. Such  security shall be provided by the date specified in the site
certificate, which shall be no later  than the commencement of construction of the facility. The site
certificate shall require that the offset funds be  disbursed as specified in subparagraph (A) of this
paragraph, unless the council finds that no qualified organization exists,  in which case the site
certificate shall require that the offset  funds be disbursed as specified in subparagraph (B) of this
paragraph.
(A) The site certificate holder shall disburse the offset funds and any other  funds required by
sub-subparagraph (ii) of this subparagraph to the qualified organization as follows:
(i) When the site certificate holder receives written notice from the qualified organization cer-
tifying that the qualified organization is contractually obligated to pay  any funds to implement off-
sets using the offset funds, the site certificate holder shall make the  requested amount available to
the qualified organization unless the total of the amount  requested and any amounts previously re-
quested exceeds the offset funds, in which case only the remaining amount of  the offset funds shall
be made available. The qualified organization  shall use at least 80 percent of the offset funds for
contracts to implement offsets. The qualified organization shall assess offsets for their potential  to
qualify in, generate credits in or reduce obligations in other regulatory settings.  The qualified or-
ganization may use up to 20 percent of the offset funds for monitoring, evaluation, administration
and enforcement of contracts to implement offsets.
(ii) At  the request of the qualified organization and in addition to the offset funds, the site cer-
tificate holder shall pay the qualified organization an amount equal to 10  percent of the first
$500,000 of the offset funds and 4.286 percent of any offset funds in  excess of $500,000. This amount
shall not be  less than $50,000 unless a lesser amount is specified in the site certificate. This amount
compensates  the  qualified organization for its costs of selecting offsets and contracting for the im-
plementation of offsets.
(iii) Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, a site certificate  holder subject to this
subparagraph shall have no  obligation with regard to offsets, the offset funds or the funds required
Enrolled House Bill 4015 (HB 4015-INTRO) Page 9
by sub-subparagraph (ii) of this subparagraph other  than to make available to the qualified organ-
ization the total amount  required under paragraph [ (c)] (d) of this subsection and sub-subparagraph
(ii) of this subparagraph, nor shall any nonperformance, negligence or misconduct on the part of the
qualified organization be a basis for revocation  of the site certificate or any other enforcement
action by the council with respect to the site certificate holder.
(B) If the council finds there is no qualified organization, the site certificate holder shall  select
one or more offsets to be implemented pursuant to criteria  established by the council. The site
certificate holder shall give written notice  of its selections to the council and to any person re-
questing notice. On petition by the State Department of Energy, or by  any person adversely affected
or aggrieved by the site certificate holder’s selection of offsets, or on the  council’s own motion, the
council  may  review such selection. The petition must be received by the council within 30 days of
the date the notice of selection is placed in the United States  mail, with first-class postage prepaid.
The council shall approve the site certificate holder’s selection unless it finds  that the selection is
not consistent with criteria established by the  council. The site certificate holder shall contract to
implement the selected offsets within 18 months after commencing construction  of the facility unless
good cause is shown requiring additional time.  The contracts shall obligate the expenditure of at
least 85 percent of the offset funds for the implementation of offsets.  No more than 15 percent of the
offset funds may be spent on monitoring, evaluation and enforcement of the contract  to implement
the selected offsets. The council’s criteria for selection of offsets shall be  based on the criteria set
forth in paragraphs [ (b)(C) and (c)(B) ] (c)(C) and (d)(B)  of  this subsection and may also consider the
costs of particular types of offsets in relation to the expected benefits of such  offsets. The council’s
criteria shall not require the  site certificate holder to select particular offsets, and shall allow the
site certificate holder a reasonable range of  choices in selecting offsets. In addition, notwithstanding
any other provision of this section, the site certificate holder’s  financial liability for implementation,
monitoring, evaluation and enforcement  of offsets pursuant to this subsection shall be limited to the
amount of  any offset funds not already contractually obligated. Nonperformance, negligence or mis-
conduct  by  the entity or entities implementing, monitoring or evaluating the selected offset shall
not be a basis for revocation of the  site certificate or any other enforcement action by the council
with respect to the site certificate holder.
(C) Every qualified organization that has received  funds under this paragraph shall, at five-year
intervals beginning  on the date of receipt of such funds, provide the council with the information
the council requests about the qualified organization’s performance. The council shall  evaluate the
information requested and, based on such information, shall make any recommendations to  the
Legislative Assembly that the council deems appropriate.
[(e)] (f) As used in this subsection:
(A) “Adjusted to ISO conditions” means carbon  dioxide emissions and net electric power output
as determined at 59 degrees Fahrenheit, 14.7 pounds per  square inch atmospheric pressure and 60
percent  humidity.
(B) “Base load gas plant” means a generating facility that is fueled by  natural gas, except for
periods during which an alternative fuel may be used and when  such alternative fuel use shall not
exceed 10 percent of expected fuel use in Btu,  higher heating value, on an average annual basis, and
where the applicant requests and the council adopts no condition  in the site certificate for the
generating facility that would limit hours of operation other than restrictions on the  use of alter-
native fuel. The council shall assume a 100 percent capacity factor  for such plants and a 30-year
life for the plants for purposes of determining gross carbon dioxide emissions.
(C) “Carbon dioxide equivalent” means the  global warming potential of a greenhouse gas re-
flected in units of carbon dioxide.
(D) “Fossil-fueled power plant” means a generating facility  that produces electric power from
natural gas, petroleum, coal or any form of solid, liquid or gaseous fuel  derived from such material.
(E) “Generating facility” means those energy facilities that are defined  in ORS 469.300
[(11)(a)(A), (B) and (D) ] (12)(a)(A), (B) and (D) .
Enrolled House Bill 4015 (HB 4015-INTRO) Page 10
(F) “Global warming potential” means the determination of the  atmospheric warming resulting
from the release of a unit mass of a particular greenhouse gas in relation to the warming  resulting
from the release of the equivalent mass of carbon dioxide.
(G) “Greenhouse gas” means carbon dioxide, methane and nitrous oxide.
(H) “Gross carbon dioxide emissions” means the predicted carbon  dioxide emissions of the pro-
posed energy facility measured on a new and clean basis.
(I) “Net carbon dioxide emissions” means gross carbon dioxide emissions of the  proposed energy
facility, less carbon dioxide or other greenhouse gas emissions avoided, displaced  or sequestered by
any combination of cogeneration or offsets.
(J) “New and clean  basis” means the average carbon dioxide emissions rate per hour and net
electric power output of the energy facility, without degradation, as determined by a 100-hour  test
at full power completed during the  first 12 months of commercial operation of the energy facility,
with the  results adjusted for the average annual site condition for temperature, barometric pressure
and relative humidity and use of alternative fuels, and using a rate  of 117 pounds of carbon dioxide
per million Btu of natural gas fuel and a rate of 161 pounds of carbon dioxide per million Btu of
distillate fuel, if such fuel use is  proposed by the applicant. The council may by rule adjust the rate
of pounds of  carbon dioxide per million Btu for natural gas or distillate fuel. The council may by
rule set carbon dioxide emissions rates for other fuels.
(K) “Nongenerating  facility” means those energy facilities that are defined in ORS 469.300
[(11)(a)(C)] (12)(a)(C) and (E) to (I).
(L) “Offset” means an action that will be implemented by  the applicant, a third party or through
the qualified organization to avoid, sequester or displace emissions.
(M) “Offset funds” means the amount of funds determined by the council to satisfy the applicable
carbon dioxide emissions standard pursuant to paragraph [ (c)(C)] (d)(C) of this subsection.
(N) “Qualified organization” means an entity that:
(i) Is exempt from federal taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code as
amended and in effect on December 31, 1996;
(ii) Either is incorporated in the State of Oregon or is a foreign corporation  authorized to do
business in the State of Oregon;
(iii) Has in effect articles of incorporation that require that offset  funds received pursuant to
this section are used for offsets that require  that decisions on the use of the offset funds are made
by a decision-making body  composed of seven voting members of which three are appointed by the
council, three are  Oregon residents appointed by the Bullitt Foundation or an alternative environ-
mental nonprofit organization named by the body, and one is appointed by  the applicants for site
certificates that are subject to paragraph [ (d)] (e) of this  subsection and the holders of such site
certificates, and that require nonvoting membership on the body for holders of  site certificates that
have provided funds not yet disbursed under paragraph [ (d)(A)] (e)(A) of this subsection;
(iv) Has made available on an annual basis, beginning  after the first year of operation, a signed
opinion of an independent certified public accountant stating that  the qualified organization’s use
of funds pursuant  to this statute conforms with generally accepted accounting procedures except
that the qualified organization shall have one year to conform with  generally accepted accounting
principles in the event of a nonconforming audit;
(v) Has to the  extent applicable, except for good cause, entered into contracts obligating at least
60 percent of the offset funds to implement offsets within two years after the  commencement of
construction of the facility; and
(vi) Has to the extent  applicable, except for good cause, complied with paragraph [ (d)(A)(i)]
(e)(A)(i) of this subsection.
(3) Except as provided in ORS 469.504 for land use compliance and  except for those statutes and
rules for which the decision on compliance  has been delegated by the federal government to a state
agency other than the council, the facility complies with all  other Oregon statutes and administra-
tive rules identified in the project order, as  amended, as applicable to the issuance of a site certif-
icate  for  the proposed facility. If compliance with applicable Oregon statutes and administrative
Enrolled House Bill 4015 (HB 4015-INTRO) Page 11
rules, other than those involving federally  delegated programs, would result in conflicting conditions
in the site  certificate, the council may resolve the conflict consistent with the public interest. A
resolution may not result in the waiver of any applicable state statute.
(4) The facility complies with the statewide planning goals adopted by the Land Conservation
and Development Commission.
SECTION 4.  ORS 469.504 is amended to read:
469.504. (1) A proposed facility shall be found in compliance with the statewide planning goals
under ORS 469.503 (4) if:
(a) The facility has received local land use approval under the  acknowledged comprehensive
plan and land use regulations of the affected local government; or
(b) The Energy Facility Siting Council determines that:
(A) The facility complies with applicable substantive criteria  from the affected local
government’s acknowledged comprehensive plan and land use regulations  that are required by the
statewide planning goals and in effect on the  date the application is submitted, and with any Land
Conservation and Development Commission administrative rules and  goals and any land use statutes
that apply directly to the facility under ORS 197.646;
(B) For an energy facility or a related or supporting facility  that must be evaluated against the
applicable substantive criteria pursuant  to subsection (5) of this section, that the proposed facility
does not comply with one or more of the applicable substantive  criteria but does otherwise comply
with the applicable statewide planning goals, or that an exception to any applicable  statewide
planning goal is justified under subsection (2) of this section; or
(C) For a facility that the council elects to evaluate against  the statewide planning goals pur-
suant to subsection (5) of this section, that  the proposed facility complies with the applicable
statewide planning goals or that an exception to any applicable statewide planning goal  is justified
under subsection (2) of this section.
(2) The council may find goal compliance  for a facility that does not otherwise comply with one
or more statewide planning goals by taking an exception to  the applicable goal. Notwithstanding
the requirements of ORS 197.732, the statewide planning goal pertaining  to the exception process
or any  rules of the Land Conservation and Development Commission pertaining to an exception
process goal, the council may take an exception to a goal if the council finds:
(a) The land subject to the exception is physically developed to the extent  that the land is no
longer available for uses allowed by the applicable goal;
(b) The land subject to the exception is irrevocably  committed as described by the rules of the
Land Conservation and Development Commission to uses not allowed  by the applicable goal because
existing adjacent uses and other relevant factors make uses allowed  by the applicable goal imprac-
ticable;  or
(c) The following standards are met:
(A) Reasons justify why the state policy embodied in the applicable goal should not apply;
(B) The significant environmental, economic, social and  energy consequences anticipated as a
result of  the proposed facility have been identified and adverse impacts will be mitigated in ac-
cordance with rules of the council applicable to the siting of the proposed facility; and
(C) The proposed facility is compatible with other adjacent uses or  will be made compatible
through measures designed to reduce adverse impacts.
(3) If compliance with applicable substantive local criteria and applicable  statutes and state
administrative rules would result in conflicting  conditions in the site certificate or amended site
certificate, the council shall resolve the conflict consistent with the public interest. A resolution
may not result in a waiver of any applicable state statute.
(4) An applicant  for a site certificate shall elect whether to demonstrate compliance with the
statewide planning goals under subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this section. The applicant shall  make the
election on or before the date specified by the council by rule.
(5) Upon request by the State Department of Energy, the special advisory group established
under ORS  469.480 shall recommend to the council, within the time stated in the request, the ap-
Enrolled House Bill 4015 (HB 4015-INTRO) Page 12
plicable substantive criteria under subsection (1)(b)(A) of this section.  If the special advisory group
does not recommend applicable substantive criteria  within the time established in the department’s
request, the council may either determine and apply the  applicable substantive criteria under sub-
section (1)(b) of this section or determine compliance with the statewide planning goals  under sub-
section (1)(b)(B) or  (C) of this section. If the special advisory group recommends applicable
substantive criteria  for an energy facility described in ORS 469.300 or a related or supporting fa-
cility that does not pass through  more than one local government jurisdiction or more than three
zones in  any one jurisdiction, the council shall apply the criteria recommended by the special advi-
sory group. If the  special advisory group recommends applicable substantive criteria for an energy
facility as defined in ORS 469.300 [ (11)(a)(C)] (12)(a)(C) to  (E) or a related or supporting facility that
passes through more than one jurisdiction  or more than three zones in any one jurisdiction, the
council shall review  the recommended criteria and determine whether to evaluate the proposed fa-
cility against the applicable substantive  criteria recommended by the special advisory group, against
the statewide planning goals or against a combination of the applicable substantive  criteria and
statewide planning goals. In making its determination, the  council shall consult with the special
advisory group and shall consider:
(a) The number of jurisdictions and zones in question;
(b) The degree to which the  applicable substantive criteria reflect local government consider-
ation of energy facilities in the planning process; and
(c) The level of consistency  of the applicable substantive criteria from the various zones and
jurisdictions.
(6) The council is not subject to ORS 197.180 and a  state agency may not require an applicant
for a site certificate to comply with any rules or programs adopted under ORS 197.180.
(7) On or before its next periodic review, each affected local government  shall amend its com-
prehensive plan and land  use regulations as necessary to reflect the decision of the council per-
taining to a site certificate or amended site certificate.
(8) Notwithstanding ORS 34.020 or 197.825 or any  other provision of law, the affected local
government’s land use approval of a proposed  facility under subsection (1)(a) of this section and the
special advisory group’s  recommendation of applicable substantive criteria under subsection (5) of
this section shall be subject to judicial review only as provided in ORS 469.403.  If the applicant
elects to comply with subsection (1)(a) of this section, the provisions of this subsection shall  apply
only to proposed projects for which the land use approval of the local government  occurs after the
date a notice of intent or an application for  expedited processing is submitted to the State Depart-
ment of Energy.
(9) The State Department of Energy, in cooperation with other state  agencies, shall provide, to
the extent  possible, technical assistance and information about the siting process to local govern-
ments that request such assistance or that anticipate having  a facility proposed in their jurisdiction.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 498.502 is amended to read:
498.502. (1)  Subject to and consistent with the federal Endangered Species Act of 1973 (P.L.
93-205, 16 U.S.C. 1531 et seq.) and notwithstanding any provision of ORS 496.171 to 496.182:
(a) If a person applies for a permit, license, authorization or other  form of permission required
by law from a state agency for a proposed action that may affect core area  habitat of sage grouse,
the person may file with the State Department of Fish and Wildlife, at any time before or after the
commencement of the relevant permitting, licensing, authorization or other form of permission
process, a report that uses the best  scientific and commercial data available to provide a description
of the proposed action and its possible effects on the habitat.
(b) The report described in this section must describe the core area habitat  of sage grouse af-
fected by the proposed action, specify whether the habitat is essential and  irreplaceable and provide
proposals for off-site mitigation or a mitigation bank.
(c)(A) Within 60 days after the filing  of the report described in this section, the department shall
evaluate whether the proposals specified in the  report result in a net loss of either the quality or
Enrolled House Bill 4015 (HB 4015-INTRO) Page 13
quantity of sage grouse habitat and provide a  net benefit to the quality or quantity of sage grouse
habitat.
(B)(i) If the department concludes that the proposals  specified in the report do not result in a
net loss of either the quality or quantity of sage grouse habitat and do provide a net benefit  to the
quality or quantity of sage  grouse habitat, the department shall issue an order finding that the core
area habitat of sage grouse affected by the proposed action is not irreplaceable. The department
may not thereafter reverse or modify the order except pursuant to a judgment of a court.
(ii) If the department  concludes that the proposals specified in the report result in a net loss
of either the quality or quantity of sage  grouse habitat and do not provide a net benefit to the
quality or quantity  of sage grouse habitat, a person affected by the action may request a contested
case hearing before the State Fish and Wildlife Commission, to  be conducted as provided in ORS
chapter 183.
(2) The provisions of this section apply  to a site certificate for an energy facility described in
ORS 469.300 [ (11)(a)(F)] (12)(a)(F), but do not apply to  a site certificate for any other facility under
the provisions of ORS 469.300 to 469.563.
(3) The commission may adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this section.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 469.373 is amended to read:
469.373. (1) Notwithstanding the expedited review process established  pursuant to ORS 469.370,
an applicant may apply  under the provisions of this section for expedited review of an application
for a site certificate for an energy facility if the energy facility:
(a) Is a combustion turbine energy facility  fueled by natural gas or is a reciprocating engine
fueled by natural gas, including an energy facility that uses petroleum distillate  fuels for backup
power generation;
(b) Is a permitted or conditional use allowed under an applicable local  acknowledged compre-
hensive plan, land use regulation or federal land use plan, and is located:
(A) At or adjacent to an existing energy facility; or
(B)(i) At, adjacent to or in close proximity to an existing industrial use; and
(ii) In an area currently zoned or designated for industrial use;
(c)(A) Requires no more than three miles of associated transmission lines or three miles of  new
natural gas pipelines outside of  existing rights of way for transmission lines or natural gas pipelines;
or
(B) Imposes, in the determination of  the Energy Facility Siting Council, no significant impact in
the locating of associated transmission lines  or new natural gas pipelines outside of existing rights
of way;
(d) Requires no new water right or water right transfer;
(e) Provides funds to a  qualified organization in an amount determined by the council to be
sufficient to produce any required  reduction in emissions as specified in ORS 469.503 [ (2)(c)(C)]
(2)(d)(C) and in rules  adopted under ORS 469.503 for the total carbon dioxide emissions produced
by the energy facility for the life of the energy facility; and
(f)(A) Discharges process wastewater to a wastewater  treatment facility that has an existing
National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit, can  obtain an industrial pretreatment
permit, if needed, within the expedited review process time frame and has written  confirmation from
the wastewater facility permit holder that the additional wastewater load will be accommodated by
the facility without resulting in a significant thermal increase in the facility effluent or without re-
quiring any changes to the wastewater facility National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System
permit;
(B) Plans to discharge process  wastewater to a wastewater treatment facility owned by a mu-
nicipal corporation that  will accommodate the wastewater from the energy facility and supplies ev-
idence from the municipal corporation that:
(i) The municipal corporation has included, or intends to include,  the process wastewater load
from the energy facility in an application for a National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System
permit; and
Enrolled House Bill 4015 (HB 4015-INTRO) Page 14
(ii) All conditions required of the energy facility to allow the discharge of  process wastewater
from the energy facility will be satisfied; or
(C) Obtains a National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System or water  pollution control fa-
cility permit for process wastewater  disposal, supplies evidence to support a finding that the dis-
charge can likely be permitted within the expedited review process time frame and that the
discharge will not require:
(i) A new National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit, except for  a storm water
general permit for construction activities; or
(ii) A change in any effluent limit or  discharge location under an existing National Pollutant
Discharge Elimination System or water pollution control facility permit.
(2) An applicant seeking expedited review under this section shall submit documentation to  the
State Department  of Energy, prior to the submission of an application for a site certificate, that
demonstrates that the energy facility meets  the qualifications set forth in subsection (1) of this
section. The department shall determine, within 14 days of receipt of the documentation, on a pre-
liminary, nonbinding basis, whether the energy facility qualifies for expedited review.
(3) If the department determines that  the energy facility preliminarily qualifies for expedited
review, the applicant may submit an application for  expedited review. Within 30 days after the date
that the application for expedited review is submitted, the  department shall determine whether the
application is complete. If the department determines that the application is complete, the applica-
tion shall be deemed filed on the  date that the department sends the applicant notice of its deter-
mination. If the department determines that the application  is not complete, the department shall
notify the applicant of the deficiencies in the application and shall deem the application filed on the
date that  the department determines that the application is complete. The department or the
council may request additional information from the applicant at any time.
(4) The State Department of Energy  shall send a copy of a filed application to the Department
of Environmental Quality, the Water Resources Department, the State Department of Fish and
Wildlife, the State Department of Geology and Mineral Industries, the State Department of  Agri-
culture, the Department of Land Conservation and Development, the Public  Utility Commission and
any other state agency, city, county or political subdivision of the state that  has regulatory or ad-
visory  responsibility  with respect to the proposed energy facility. The State Department of Energy
shall send with the copy of the filed application a notice specifying that:
(a) In the event the council issues  a site certificate for the energy facility, the site certificate
will bind the state and all counties, cities and political subdivisions in the  state as to the approval
of the site, the construction of the energy facility and the operation of the  energy facility, and that
after the issuance of a site certificate, all permits, licenses and certificates addressed in  the site
certificate must be issued as required by ORS 469.401 (3); and
(b) The comments and recommendations of state agencies,  counties, cities and political subdivi-
sions concerning whether the proposed energy facility complies with any  statute, rule or local or-
dinance that the state agency, county, city or  political subdivision would normally administer in
determining whether a  permit, license or certificate required for the construction or operation of the
energy facility should be approved will be considered only  if the comments and recommendations
are received by the department within a reasonable time after the date the  application and notice
of the application are sent by the department.
(5) Within 90 days after the date that the application was filed,  the department shall issue a
draft proposed order setting forth:
(a) A description of the proposed energy facility;
(b) A list of the permits, licenses and certificates  that are addressed in the application and that
are required for the construction or operation of the proposed energy facility;
(c) A list of the statutes, rules and local  ordinances that are the standards and criteria for ap-
proval of any permit, license or certificate  addressed in the application and that are required for the
construction or operation of the proposed energy facility; and
Enrolled House Bill 4015 (HB 4015-INTRO) Page 15
(d) Proposed findings specifying how the proposed energy  facility complies with the applicable
standards and criteria for approval of a site certificate.
(6) The  council shall review the application for site certification in the manner set forth in
subsections (7) to (10) of this section and shall issue a site  certificate for the facility if the council
determines that the facility, with any required conditions to the site certificate, will comply with:
(a) The requirements for expedited review as specified in this section;
(b) The  standards adopted by the council pursuant to ORS 469.501 (1)(a), (c) to (e), (g), (h) and
(L) to (o);
(c) The requirements of ORS 469.503 (3); and
(d) The requirements of ORS 469.504 (1)(b).
(7) Following submission of an  application for a site certificate, the council shall hold a public
informational meeting on the application. Following the issuance of the proposed order, the council
shall hold at least one public hearing  on the application. The public hearing shall be held in the
area affected by the energy facility. The council shall mail notice of the hearing at least 20 days
prior to the hearing.  The notice shall comply with the notice requirements of ORS 197.797 (2) and
shall include, but need not be limited to, the following:
(a) A description of the energy facility and the general location of the energy facility;
(b) The name  of a department representative to contact and the telephone number at which
people may obtain additional information;
(c) A statement that copies of the application and proposed order are available  for inspection
at no cost and will be provided at reasonable cost; and
(d) A statement that the record for public comment on the application will  close at the conclu-
sion of the hearing and that failure to raise an  issue in person or in writing prior to the close of
the record, with sufficient specificity to afford the decision maker an opportunity to respond to  the
issue, will preclude consideration of the issue, by the council or by a court on judicial review of  the
council’s decision.
(8) Prior to the conclusion of the hearing,  the applicant may request an opportunity to present
additional written evidence, arguments  or testimony regarding the application. In the alternative,
prior to the conclusion of the hearing, the applicant  may request a contested case hearing on the
application. If the applicant requests an opportunity to  present written evidence, arguments or tes-
timony, the council shall leave  the record open for that purpose only for a period not to exceed 14
days after the date of the  hearing. Following the close of the record, the department shall prepare
a draft final order for the council. If the applicant requests a contested case hearing, the  council
may grant the request if the applicant  has shown good cause for a contested case hearing. If a re-
quest for  a contested case hearing is granted, subsections (9) to (11) of this section do not apply,
and the application shall be considered under the  same contested case procedures used for a non-
expedited application for a site certificate.
(9) The council shall make its  decision based on the record and the draft final order prepared
by the department. The  council shall, within six months of the date that the application is deemed
filed:
(a) Grant the application;
(b) Grant the application with conditions;
(c) Deny the application; or
(d) Return the application to the site certification process required by ORS 469.320.
(10) If the application is granted, the council shall issue  a site certificate pursuant to ORS
469.401 and  469.402. Notwithstanding subsection (6) of this section, the council may impose condi-
tions based on standards adopted under ORS 469.501 (1)(b), (f) and (i) to  (k), but may not deny an
application based on those standards.
(11) Judicial review of the approval or rejection of a site certificate  by the council under this
section shall be as provided in ORS 469.403.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 469.409 is amended to read:
Enrolled House Bill 4015 (HB 4015-INTRO) Page 16
469.409. Any site certificate holder that is required by its  site certificate or by law to demon-
strate need for the facility shall instead demonstrate compliance  with the carbon dioxide emissions
standard applicable to the type of  facility subject to the site certificate before beginning con-
struction. Such a demonstration shall be made as an amendment  to the site certificate.
Notwithstanding ORS 469.405 or any council  rule, if the site certificate holder proceeds pursuant to
ORS 469.503 [(2)(c)(A)] (2)(d)(A) or (C), or both, the  Energy Facility Siting Council shall not conduct
a contested case  hearing on such amendment and the council’s order shall not be subject to judicial
review. Any dispute  about the site certificate holder’s demonstration of compliance with the appli-
cable carbon dioxide emissions standard shall be settled through binding arbitration.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 8. The unit captions used in this 2024 Act are provided only for the convenience
of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this state or express any  leg-
islative intent in the enactment of this 2024 Act.
EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 9. This 2024 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date  on which the 2024
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by House February 15, 2024
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 5, 2024
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4015 (HB 4015-INTRO) Page 17